Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2,138
Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing the Uniform Easement Relocation Act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among the states that enact it.

Laws 2021, LB501, § 75.